Nebraska, session 109, LB244.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB244 LB244
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 49-1402, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1402 The Legislature finds that:
(1) The That the public interest in the manner in which election
campaigns are conducted has increased greatly in recent years, creating a
need for additional accountability and disclosure and accountability;
(2) There That there is a compelling state interest in ensuring that
the state and local elections are free of corruption and the appearance
of corruption and that this can only be achieved if (a) the sources of
funding of campaigns are fully disclosed and (b) the use of money in
campaigns is fully disclosed;
(3) It That it is essential to the proper operation of democratic
government that public officials and employees be independent and
impartial, that governmental decisions and policy be made in the proper
channels of governmental structure, and that public office or employment
not be used for private gain other than the compensation provided by law;
and
(4) The That the attainment of one or more of these ends is impaired
when there exists, or appears to exist, a substantial conflict between
the private interests of a public official and his or her duties as such
official. Although, ; and that although the vast majority of public
officials and employees are dedicated and serve with high integrity, the
public interest requires that the law provide greater accountability,
disclosure, and guidance with respect to the conduct of public officials
and employees.
Sec. 2. Original section 49-1402, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-